New Jersey, session 222, S1428.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Civil Service Commission, in consultation with the appropriate testing professional, shall include on the Civil Service Examination for entry-level law enforcement officers questions designed to identify implicit bias, including racial bias. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following enactment, but the Civil Service Commission may take any anticipatory administrative action necessary to implement the provisions of this act.